Massachusetts, session 194th, S1139.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of Chapter 229 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, after the word “deceased”, in line 34, the
following words:- “. An action to recover damages under this section is not derivative of any
personal injury claim brought by the decedent and may be commenced regardless of whether the
decedent timely commenced a claim for the injury causing death”.
SECTION 2. This act shall apply retroactively to July 6, 2023.
of 1